Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 1. Ownership and Uses of Submerged Lands
§ 28.2-1207.
Authority to approve permits for encroachment on subaqueous beds; notice.

Any application for a permit to trespass upon or over or encroach upon subaqueous beds which are the Commonwealth’s property may be approved by the Commissioner or his authorized representative if the application meets the requirements of §§

28.2-1205

and

28.2-1206

and the following criteria are satisfied:

The total value of the project does not exceed $500,000;

The application is not protested by any citizen or objected to by any state agency; and

The project for which the permit is sought will not require any other permit from the Commission.

If the permit application is for a shore erosion control project recommended by the soil and water conservation district in which the project is to be located and the criteria listed in subsection A of this section are satisfied, the Commission may, after giving notice of the application to the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, approve the application without giving notice to or awaiting the approval of any other state agency.

The Commission shall, in conjunction with affected state and federal agencies, develop an expedited process for issuing general permits for activities that are intended to improve water quality such as bioengineered streambank projects and livestock stream crossings, and for activities required during emergencies in which a determination has been made that there is a threat to public or private property, or to the health and safety of the public. The development of the general permit shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

The Commission shall, in conjunction with affected state and federal agencies, develop an expedited process for issuing a permit for emergency activities intended to restore sand to any publicly owned beach damaged by sand erosion. Such erosion shall have been caused by a discrete, identifiable weather event or sequence of events that threatened public or private property or public health and safety and was the subject of a declaration of emergency by the Governor or the governing body of the locality in which the project is located. The development of the permit shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

1972, c. 398, § 62.1-3.01; 1973, c. 350, § 62.1-3.02; 1980, c. 312; 1984, c. 246; 1992, c. 836; 1997, c. 845; 2011, c. 451; 2016, cc. 9, 124.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 451 substituted “$500,000” for “$50,000” in subdivision A 1.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 9 and 124 are identical, and substituted “2.2-4006” for “2.2-4007” in subsection C and added subsection D.

§ 28.2-1208.
Granting easements in, permitting the use of, or leasing the beds of certain waters.

The Commission may, with the approval of the Attorney General and the Governor, grant easements over or under or lease the beds of the waters of the Commonwealth outside of the Baylor Survey. Every easement or lease executed pursuant to this section shall be for a period not to exceed five years, except in the case of offshore renewable energy leases described in clause (ii), in which case the period shall not exceed 30 years, and shall specify the rent and such other terms deemed expedient and proper. Such easements and leases may include the right to renew the same for an additional period not to exceed five years. Any lease that authorizes grantees or lessees to (i) prospect for and take from the bottoms covered thereby specified minerals and mineral substances or (ii) generate electrical energy from wave or tidal action, currents, offshore winds, or thermal or salinity gradients, and transmit energy from such sources to shore shall require a royalty. Except for offshore renewable energy leases, purchase payment for any easement granted to a public service corporation, certificated telephone company, interstate natural gas company or provider of cable television or other multichannel video programming service shall be $100 and shall be for a period of 40 years. However, no easement or lease shall in any way affect or interfere with the rights vouchsafed to the people of the Commonwealth concerning fishing, fowling, and the catching and taking of oysters and other shellfish in and from the leased bottoms or the waters above.

All easements granted and leases made pursuant to this section shall be executed for, and in the name and on behalf of, the Commonwealth by the Attorney General and shall be countersigned by the Governor.

All mineral royalties collected from such easements or leases on and after July 1, 2000, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Marine Habitat and Waterways Improvement Fund. All royalties collected as a result of the generation or transmission of electrical or compressed air energy from offshore renewable sources including wave or tidal action, currents, offshore winds, and thermal or salinity gradients shall be paid into the state treasury and appropriated to the Virginia Coastal Energy Research Consortium established pursuant to §

45.2-1714

.

Prior to December 1 of each year, the Commissioner and the Attorney General shall make reports to the General Assembly on all easements and leases executed pursuant to this section during the preceding 12 months.

The Commission shall, in cooperation with the Division of Geology and Mineral Resources of the Department of Energy and with the assistance of affected state agencies, departments and institutions, including the Virginia Coastal Energy Research Consortium, maintain a State Subaqueous Minerals and Coastal Energy Management Plan that shall supplement the State Minerals Management Plan set forth in §

2.2-1157

and the Virginia Energy Plan (§

45.2-1710

et seq.). The State Subaqueous Minerals and Coastal Energy Management Plan shall include provisions for (i) the holding of public hearings, (ii) public advertising for competitive bids or proposals for mineral and renewable energy leasing and extraction activities, (iii) preparation of environmental impact reports to be reviewed by the appropriate agency of the Commonwealth, and (iv) review and approval of leases by the Attorney General and the Governor as required by subsection A. The environmental impact reports shall address, but not be limited to:

The environmental impact of the proposed activity;

Any adverse environmental effects that cannot be avoided if the proposed activity is undertaken;

Measures proposed to minimize the impact of the proposed activity;

Any alternative to the proposed activity; and

Any irreversible environmental changes which would be involved in the proposed activity.For the purposes of subdivision 4 of this subsection, the report shall contain all alternatives considered and the reasons why the alternatives were rejected. If a report does not set forth alternatives, it shall state why alternatives were not considered.

Neither the Commission nor the Department of Energy shall grant any lease, easement, or permit allowing on the beds of any of the coastal waters of the Commonwealth any infrastructure for conveying to shore oil or gas produced from an offshore oil or gas lease in the portion of the Atlantic Ocean identified as the Outer Continental Shelf (OCS) Planning Area by the U.S. Bureau of Ocean Energy Management. For purposes of this section, the term “infrastructure” includes pipelines, gathering systems, processing facilities, and storage facilities. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any infrastructure in existence as of July 1, 2020.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-3; 1958, c. 290; 1962, c. 637; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-4; 1986, c. 488; 1992, c. 836; 1993, c. 644; 2000, c. 1056; 2004, cc. 899, 1018; 2008, c. 369; 2009, c. 766; 2020, cc. 451, 452; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Cross references.

As to Oyster Replenishment Fund, see §

28.2-542

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 766, cl. 2 provides: “That the Marine Resources Commission, in consultation with the Virginia Coastal Energy Research Consortium, other state agencies, conservation and industry representatives, and other interested parties as appropriate, shall (i) identify 100 acres suitable for use by the Virginia Coastal Energy Research Consortium as a research site; and (ii) determine whether sufficient and appropriate subaqueous land exists in state territorial waters to support the generation and transmission of electrical or compressed air energy from offshore wind. The Marine Resources Commission shall by March 1, 2010, submit its findings in a written report to the General Assembly.”

Acts 2009, c. 766, cl. 3 provides: “If sufficient and appropriate subaqueous land exists, and pursuant to requirements and provisions of subsections A and B of §

28.2-1208

of this act, the Marine Resources Commission shall offer such land in a lease auction to parties willing, and able within a reasonable time, to convert such wind resources to electrical or compressed air energy and transmit such energy to shore.”

Acts 2009, c. 766, cl. 4 provides: “Nothing in this act requires or prohibits auctions of leases for transmission of renewable energy generated in federal waters.”

Acts 2020, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 3, was codified as the last sentence in subsection F at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Effective October 1, 2021, “§

45.2-1714

” was substituted for “§ 67-600” in subsection C and “(§

45.2-1710

et seq.)” was substituted for “(§ 67-200 et seq.)” in subsection E to conform to the recodification of Title 45.1 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1056, effective July 1, 2001, in subsection C, inserted “on and after July 1, 2000” and substituted “Marine Habitat and Waterways Improvement” for “Public Oyster Rocks Replenishment.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 899 and 1018 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “over or under” for “in” in the first sentence and deleted “royalties” following “specify the rent” in the second sentence; in the third sentence, substituted “grantees or” for “grantees and” and added the proviso; and added the fourth sentence; in subsection C, substituted “oil, gas and other minerals” for “rents or”; substituted “12 months” for “twelve months” in subsection D; and made minor stylistic changes in subsection E.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 369 inserted “Geology and” preceding “Mineral Resources of the Department” in the first sentence of subsection E.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 766 rewrote subsection A; added the second sentence in subsection C; and in subsection E, in the first sentence, inserted “including the Virginia Coastal Energy Research Consortium” and “and Coastal Energy” and added “and the Virginia Energy Plan (§ 67-200 et seq.)” at the end and inserted “and Coastal Energy” and “and renewable energy” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 451 and 452 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “Marine Resources” preceding “Commission” in the first sentence and “oil, gas, and other” preceding “specified minerals” in clause (i); in subsection C, substituted “mineral” for “oil, gas and other minerals” in the first sentence and added subsection F.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, in subsection E in the introductory language and in subsection F, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

§ 28.2-1209.
Maintenance or removal of structures erected upon or over state-owned subaqueous bottoms.

Any person constructing or erecting any structure upon or over state-owned subaqueous bottoms, or their grantees or assignees for value, shall be responsible for the maintenance or removal of the structure upon its abandonment or its falling into a state of disrepair.
However, public service corporations may abandon cables, conduit and pipes upon prior approval of the Commission.

History.

1974, c. 274, § 62.1-3.03; 1992, c. 836.